Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,143
Ouster of corporation; liability of officers for misconduct.

When judgment of ouster is rendered against a corporation on account of the misconduct of the directors or officers thereof, such officers shall be jointly and severally liable to an action by anyone injured thereby.

R.S.1867, Code § 726, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8350;

C.S.1922, § 9302;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,134;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,143.